test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-havvske_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Adjektiv - hávvske: # -e-stammar
    hávvske+A+Sg+Nom: hávvske
    hávvske+A+Attr: hávskes
    hávvske+A+Sg+Gen: hávske
    hávvske+A+Sg+Acc: hávskev
    hávvske+A+Sg+Ill: hávvskáj
    hávvske+A+Sg+Ine: hávsken
    hávvske+A+Sg+Ela: hávskest
    hávvske+A+Sg+Com: hávskijn
    hávvske+A+Pl+Nom: hávske
    hávvske+A+Pl+Gen: hávskij
    hávvske+A+Pl+Acc: hávskijt
    hávvske+A+Pl+Ill: hávskijda
    hávvske+A+Pl+Ine: hávskijn
    hávvske+A+Pl+Ela: hávskijst
    hávvske+A+Pl+Com: hávskij
    hávvske+A+Ess: hávvsken
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: hávskep
    hávvske+A+Comp+Attr: hávskep
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: hávskebu
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: hávskebuv
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: hávskebuj
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: hávskebun
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: hávskebust
    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Com: hávskebujn
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: hávskebu
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: hávskebuj
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: hávskebujt
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: hávskebujda
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: hávskebujn
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: hávskebujst
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Com: hávskebuj
    hávvske+A+Comp+Ess: hávskebun
